New Jersey, session 222, S305.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A former member of the Public Employees Retirement System who has been granted a retirement allowance prior to, or on or after, the effective date of this act, P.L.      , c.         (pending before the Legislature as this bill), for any cause other than disability, may return to an elective public office position with the former employer, either by appointment to fill a vacancy or by election, without cancellation of the retirement and reenrollment in the system if: (1) the return commences after the retirement allowance becomes due and payable; (2) the former member had attained the service retirement age, applicable to that member, as of the date of retirement; and (3) the compensation for the elective public office held is less than $12,000 per year. This section shall be effective if the qualified status of the retirement system under federal law can be maintained upon its application, and such modifications to the system as may be available shall be made to allow for its application. As used in this section, "former employer" means the public entity from which the former member retired from service performed immediately prior to retirement. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.